Florida, session 2026, SB38.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.â(1)âBeginning January 1, 2027, the Agency for 19 Health Care Administration shall reimburse licensed providers 20 who provide nonnursing services, such as home health agencies 21 and nurse registries, participating in the Medicaid long-term 22 managed care program at a rate that is at least the same rate or 23 higher than the rate it reimburses unlicensed providers for such 24 services, such as family caregivers. The agency shall annually 25 adjust the rate for licensed providers to accommodate inflation 26 and overhead costs. 27 (2)âWithin 30 days after the effective date of this act, 28 the agency shall request any Medicaid waiver or state plan 29 amendment necessary to implement these rate changes. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.